South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S890.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 37, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-37-221. (A) For the purposes of this section, "small business" means a commercial retail service, industry entity, or nonprofit corporation, including affiliates, that: (1) is registered, incorporated, and headquartered in this State; (2) is owned by a resident or residents of this State who pay income taxes in this State; (3) is independently owned and operated; and (4) employs fewer than one hundred full-time employees or has gross annual sales or program service revenues of less than three million dollars. (B)(1) In addition to the exemptions provided in Section 12-37-220(A) and (B), a taxpayer who is a majority owner of a small business, as defined in this section, is entitled to a property bill tax credit of ten thousand dollars. (2) A taxpayer shall not use the tax credit in this section more than one time each tax year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----